District of Columbia statutes.
35-216

Failure to pay established fare or to present valid transfer; entry by rear exit door prohibited.

No person shall either knowingly board a public or private passenger vehicle for hire, including vehicles owned and/or operated by the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority, which is transporting passengers within the corporate limits of the District of Columbia; or knowingly board a rail transit car owned and/or operated by the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority which is transporting passengers within the corporate limits of the District of Columbia; or knowingly enter or leave the paid area of a real transit station owned and/or operated by the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority which is located within the corporate limits of the District of Columbia without paying the established fare or presenting a valid transfer for transportation on such public passenger vehicle or rail transit car. No person shall board a public or private passenger vehicle for hire, including vehicles owned and/or operated by the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority, through the rear exit door, unless so directed by an employee or agent of the carrier.

Feb. 22, 1978, D.C. Law 2-40, § 2, 24 DCR 3344
This section is referenced in § 35-252 and § 35-253.
1981 Ed., § 44-224.
1973 Ed., § 44-216.1.